Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB168.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) The director of legislative administrative services may
retain legislative video recordings on any cloud-based server or video on
demand platform for a period of 10 years from the date such recording was
made. The director of legislative administrative services shall not retain
any legislative video recording on any cloud server or video on demand
platform beyond such 10-year period and shall remove, or cause to be
removed, any such legislative video recording from any cloud-based
server or video on demand platform at the end of such 10-year period.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Cloud-based server" means a virtual server operating within a
cloud computing environment that allows users to access computing
resources such as processing, storage and applications remotely and on
demand by a user.
(2) "Video on demand platform" means an audiovisual media
distribution system that allows users to access audiovisual content and
digital media on demand by a user.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.